Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.180

Notice to lienholders.

The plaintiff must cause a notice to be served at least twenty days before the time for appearance on each person having such lien by judgment or decree, to appear before the referee at a specified time and place to make proof by his or her own affidavit or otherwise, of the true amount due or to become due, contingently or absolutely on his or her judgment or decree.

[ 2011 c 336 s 225; Code 1881 s 569; 1877 p 120 s 572; 1869 p 136 s 522; RRS s 855.]